Massachusetts, session 194th, S2035.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 63 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by striking items (e) and (f) under the definition of “net income” and inserting
in place thereof the following:-
(e) the deduction allowed by section 199 of the Code;
(f) the deduction described in section 163(e)(5) of the Code, to the extent increased by
amendments to section 163(e)(5)(F) and section 163(i)(1) of the Code, inserted by section 1232
of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009; or
(g) the deduction described in section 162(a) of the Code, to the extent that this deduction
applies to direct consumer advertising of prescription drugs, which shall include all direct and
of 2

indirect costs incurred or paid relating to advertising prescription drugs and devices to patients in
Massachusetts, including media advertising, coupons, outreach and persistency programs, and
any other forms of marketing or advertising directed to persons other than licensed prescribers.
For amounts paid or incurred in national or regional programs, the amount disallowed shall be
the ratable share of expenses directed to Massachusetts residents.
of 2